Maine, session 132, LD2032.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 34-B MRSA §3862-A, sub-§4, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 675, §17,
is further amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) Provide a copy to the court of the judicial endorsement and all attachments and
the notification to the restricted person, including the date of notification.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 1 - 132LR2807(03)